Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 5. Labor Relations Agency.

Sec. 23.05.360.
Alaska labor relations agency.

There is established within the Department of Labor and Workforce Development the Alaska labor relations agency. The agency is comprised of six members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the legislature. The term of office of a member is three years. Members serve staggered terms in accordance with AS

39.05.055

. A vacancy in an unexpired term shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the remainder of the term. The agency must include two members with a background in management, two members with a background in labor, and two members from the general public. All members must have relevant experience in labor relations matters.

Not more than three members of the agency may be members of the same political party.

Members of the agency may be removed by the governor only for cause.

Members of the agency receive no compensation for their services, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions.

The governor shall designate a chair from the public members. The chair holds office at the pleasure of the governor.

For purposes of holding hearings, the members of the board sit in panels of three members. The chair designates the panel that will consider a matter. Each panel must include a representative of management, a representative of labor, and a representative from the general public. A member of one panel may serve on the other panel when the chair considers it necessary for the prompt administration of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act) or AS 42.40 (Alaska Railroad Corporation Act).

History.

(E.O. No. 77 § 2 (1990); am §§ 1 — 3 ch 43 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For travel and per diem for members of boards and commissions, see AS

39.20.180

.

Administrative Code. —

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

Sec. 23.05.370.
Powers, duties, and functions of Alaska labor relations agency.

The agency shall

establish its own rules of procedure;

exercise general supervision and direct the activities of staff assigned to it by the department;

prepare and submit to the governor an annual report on labor relations problems it has encountered during the previous year, including recommendations for legislative action; the agency shall notify the legislature that the report is available;

serve as the labor relations agency under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act) and carry out the functions specified in that Act; and

serve as the railroad labor relations agency for the Alaska Railroad under AS 42.40 (Alaska Railroad Corporation Act) and carry out the functions specified in that Act.

Two members of a panel constitute a quorum for hearing cases. Action taken by a quorum of a panel in a case is considered the action of the full board. Four members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business other than hearing cases.

History.

(E.O. No. 77 § 2 (1990); am §§ 4, 5 ch 43 SLA 1993; am § 45 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 23.05.380.
Regulations.

The agency shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out labor relations functions under AS

23.05.360

—

23.05.390

, AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

, and AS

42.40.730

—

42.40.890

.

History.

(E.O. No. 77 § 2 (1990))

Administrative Code. —

For certification, see 8 AAC 97, art. 1.

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

For impasse, see 8 AAC 97, art. 3.

For right of nonassociation, see 8 AAC 97, art. 4.

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

For collective bargaining agreement, see 8 AAC 97, art. 6.

Sec. 23.05.390.
Definition.

In AS

23.05.360

—

23.05.390

, “agency” means the Alaska labor relations agency established in AS

23.05.360

.

History.

(E.O. No. 77 § 2 (1990))